Utah, session 2026, SB165.
Section 1. Section 63N-3-1801 is enacted to read:18. Raising Expectations through Accountability, Community, and Hope Initiative63N-3-1801. Raising Expectations through Accountability, Community, and Hope initiative.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Backbone organization" means a nonprofit entity, government, or higher education entity that coordinates activities among multiple organizations in a neighborhood, community, or region working toward shared outcomes.(b)"Community indicators" means the measurable outcomes tracked at the community level to assess progress toward program results, including:(i)the percentage of children living in households experiencing intergenerational poverty;(ii)kindergarten readiness rates;(iii)third grade reading proficiency rates;(iv)eighth grade math proficiency rates;(v)postsecondary readiness rates;(vi)high school graduation rates;(vii)college graduation rates;(viii)employment rates;(ix)the percentage of families meeting self-sufficiency income standards;(x)civic engagement participation rates;(xi)behavioral health service access and outcomes;(xii)housing stability rates;(xiii)health outcomes; and(xiv)median household income and poverty rates.(c)"Eligible community" means a community that meets one or more of the following criteria:(i)is located in a county with a population density of fewer than 10 people per square mile and limited access to services;(ii)includes a high school that serves a substantial portion of the secondary students residing in the community with a four-year cohort graduation rate of 85% or lower;(iii)demonstrates disparities in prioritized community indicators that exceed 10% below the state average; or(iv)demonstrates disparities in prioritized community indicators that exceed 20% between subgroups.(d)"LEA" means a school district or a charter school.(e)"Partnership" means a collaborative arrangement that includes:(i)a community-based organization;(ii)a local government;(iii)an LEA or school within an LEA;(iv)partners representing education, health, workforce, housing, business, or community development sectors; and(v)parents, youth, and community residents.(f)"Mobility action plan" means a written plan developed by a partnership that includes:(i)specific, measurable goals for program results and community indicators;(ii)strategies to achieve the goals, aligned to program pillars;(iii)a work plan with timelines and designated responsible parties;(iv)a budget and resource allocation;(v)data sharing agreements and performance measurement systems;(vi)a plan for community engagement and partnership sustainability; and(vii)a sustainability and resource leveraging and aligning strategy.(g)"Program" means the Raising Expectations through Accountability, Community, and Hope initiative established in this section.(h)"Technical assistance provider" means the entity designated by the office under Subsection (3).(2)The office shall designate a technical assistance provider to establish and administer the program to support eligible communities in creating partnerships to improve youth and family outcomes by aligning community efforts from early childhood through postsecondary education and workforce entry.(3)The office shall select a technical assistance provider that meets the following criteria:(a)demonstrated ability and commitment to fundraise private dollars from national and local philanthropic entities;(b)20 or more years of experience in grant making;(c)at least five years of experience in supporting community-based, cross-sector partnerships in the state;(d)expertise in backbone organization development and support;(e)knowledge of evidence-based practices for improving educational and economic outcomes;(f)experience with data collection, analysis, and performance measurement;(g)experience with engagement of families, youth, and underserved communities in planning and implementation; and (h)having relationships with national organizations with the ability to align technical assistance and support to community-based partnerships within the state.(4)The technical assistance provider shall:(a)support eligible communities in establishing partnerships;(b)facilitate the development of mobility action plans;(c)provide capacity building and technical assistance;(d)raise philanthropic funding to support partnership activities; and(e)facilitate peer learning and knowledge sharing across communities.(5)A partnership shall:(a)engage the backbone organization and stakeholders across multiple sectors;(b)include parents, youth, and community residents in planning and implementation;(c)develop a written mobility action plan to improve prioritized community indicators;(d)establish data sharing agreements among partners; and(e)coordinate resources across partners to achieve shared outcomes.(6)(a)In accordance with state and federal data privacy laws and upon request of the office or the technical assistance provider, the following state agencies shall provide access to relevant aggregate and individual-level data necessary to support the planning, implementation, and evaluation of partnerships, including cross-agency coordination and collaborative improvement efforts:(i)the Department of Health and Human Services;(ii)the Department of Workforce Services;(iii)the Division of Juvenile Justice Services;(iv)the State Board of Education;(v)the Utah Board of Higher Education;(vi)the Office of Guardian ad Litem;(vii)the Administrative Office of the Courts; and(viii)any other state agency or department with programs or services affecting children, youth, or families.(b)An agency or department described in Subsection (6)(a) that provides data shall provide:(i)enrollment, participation, and service utilization data;(ii)outcome and performance measurement data; and(iii)demographic data.(c)An agency or department described in Subsection (6)(a) that provides data shall:(i)ensure that data sharing complies with all applicable state and federal privacy laws;(ii)ensure that the data is used solely for purposes authorized under this section;(iii)ensure that the data does not result in disclosure of individual-level information in any manner that would identify a participant, except as authorized by law; and(iv)follow standardized formats, data definitions, and reporting schedules that the office establishes in coordination with the technical assistance provider.(d)The office shall allow the technical assistance provider and partnerships to use data provided under this section to:(i)inform technical assistance, coaching, and capacity-building;(ii)analyze trends, identify gaps, and recommend improvements to policies or services;(iii)monitor progress on community indicators and partnership outcomes; and(iv)report aggregated findings publicly while maintaining confidentiality protections.(7)A partnership may accept grants, gifts, donations, or other private funding to support partnership activities.(8)Upon request of the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee or the Education Interim Committee, the office shall collaborate with the technical assistance provider to report to the committee on:(a)the number and characteristics of communities participating in the program;(b)partnership activities and outcomes;(c)the extent of private investment leveraged; and(d)recommendations for sustaining and scaling partnership approaches.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.